epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sk.xml
		l2t3k2ou.
		l2t3k2ám.
		l2t3k2ách.
		l2t3k2a1mi.
		n2t3k2a.
		n2t3k2y.
		n2t3k2e.
		n2t3k2u.
		n2t3k2ou.
		n2t3k2ám.
		n2t3k2ách.
		n2t3k2a1mi.
		n2k2t3k
		p2t3k2a.
		p2t3k2y.
		p2t3k2e.
		p2t3k2u.
		p2t3k2ou.
		p2t3k2ám.
		p2t3k2ách.
		p2t3k2a1mi.
		s2t3k2a.
		s2t3k2y.
		s2t3k2e.
		s2t3k2u.
		s2t3k2ou.
		s2t3k2ám.
		s2t3k2ách.
		s2t3k2a1mi.
		<!-- % koncovka -ty -->
		5p4r4s3t
		<!-- % koncovka -ský,-sky -->
		b3s4k
		d3s4k
		j3s4k
		l4p3s4k
		l3s4k
		ľ3s4k
		l4t3s4k
		4m3s4k
		4m4p3s4k
		n4d3s4k
		n4k4t3s4k
		n3s4k
		n4t3s4k
		p3s4k
		p4t3s4k
		r3s4k
		r4t3s4k
		r4z5s4k
		5s4r4b3s4k
		š3s4k
		t3s4k
		v3s4k
		z3s4k
		ž3s4k
		<!-- % koncovky -ština,-čina -->
		n2d3č
		z3š2t2
		r4z3š2t2
		<!-- % koncovky -stvo -->
		b3s4t4v
		č3s4t4v
		d3s4t4v
		ď3s4t4v
		ľ3s4t4v
		m3s4t4v
		n3s4t4v
		n4t3s4t4v
		p3s4t4v
		r3s4t4v
		r4v5s4t4v
		š3s4t4v
		t3s4t4v
		v3s4t4v
		ž3s4t4v
		<!-- %predpony -->
		.a2e2ro
		.a2e2ro3d2r
		.aero3g2r
		.a2e2ro3k2l
		.aero3p2l
		.aero3s2k
		.aero3s2t
		.aero3t2r
		.akcie3s2c2h
		.ane3s2teti
		.ane3s2téz
		.anti5k4l
		.anti5k4r
		.apo5p4le
		.ap4rio
		.ap4rió
		.arci5k4
		.aristo5k4
		.as3k2lep
		.austro5s4
		.bac2k3hand
		.balne2o3
		.belo5
		.belo5h4
		.bez5
		.bez5b4
		.bez5d4
		.bez5h4
		.bez5k4
		.bez5m4
		.bez5p4
		.bez5s4
		.bez5t4
		.bez5v4
		.bez5z4
		.bielo5
		.bielob4
		.bieloh4
		.bielov4
		.bi2o5
		.biok4
		.biop4
		.bios4
		.blaho5
		.blahop4
		.blahos4
		.bledo5
		.boha5p4
		.boho5s4
		.bože5
		.bože5d4
		.božec2h4
		.brato5v4r
		.b2z2d
		.cáro5v4ra
		.celo5d4
		.celo5k4
		.celo5p4
		.celo5s4
		.celo5u4
		.ceno5t4
		.ces2t5maj
		.cirkevno5
		.cirkevno5p4
		.c4t4n
		.cudzo5k4
		.cudzo5o4
		.cudzo5s4
		.cudzo5t4
		.cudzo5v4
		.cyto5p4
		.čaro5k4
		.čaro5s4
		.čaro5v4
		.čaro5z4
		.černo5b4
		.černo5h4
		.černo5k4
		.černo5o4
		.červeno5a4
		.červeno5b4
		.červeno5h4
		.červeno5k4
		.červeno5o4
		.červeno5p4
		.čierno5b4
		.čierno5h4
		.čierno5o4
		.čo5ch4
		.čo5s4
		.čudo5t4
		.da3k2d
		.ďatelino5t4
		.de5f4
		.de5g4
		.dek4l
		.desať5
		.de5š4t2
		.dez5i2
		.dez5o2
		.dis2k3d4
		.divo5t4
		.dlho5h4
		.dlho5p4
		.dobro5d4
		.dobro5p4
		.dobro5s4
		.do5č2m
		.do5d4
		.do5f4
		.do5h4
		.do5c4h4
		.do5i4
		.do5k4
		.do5o
		.do5p4
		.do5s4
		.do5š4p
		.do5š4tie
		.do5š4tí
		.do5t4l
		.do5t4m
		.do5t4r
		.do5t4v
		.do5u
		.do5v4
		.do5z4
		.do5ž4
		.drevo5p4
		.drevo5o
		.drevo5v4
		.drobno5z4
		.druho5s4
		.dvoj5al
		.dvoj5č4
		.dvoj5d4
		.dvoj5h4
		.dvoj5i4
		.dvoj5k4
		.dvoj5p4
		.dvoj5s4
		.dvoj5t4
		.dvoj5u
		.dvoj5v4
		.dvoj5z4
		.elektro5
		.ex5k4
		.fol2k5
		.foto5
		.gala5p4
		.gama5g4
		.ge4o
		.hnedo5o
		.hnedo5u
		.holo5b4
		.holo5h4
		.holo5k4
		.hore5z4
		.horno5u4
		.hrôzo5s4t4
		.hrôzo5v4
		.hrôzy5p4
		.hrubo5s4
		.hydro5
		.chorobo5p4
		.jasno5o
		.jasno5z4
		.jedno5h4
		.jedno5i4
		.jedno5p4
		.jedno5s4
		.jedno5u4
		.jedno5z4
		.juho5a
		.juho5s4
		.južno5s4
		.kata5k4
		.kata5s4t4
		.kmeňo5t4
		.koso5d4
		.koso5š4
		.koso5u
		.krivo5p4
		.kruto5v4
		.krvi5p4
		.krvi5s4
		.krvi5t4
		.ktovie5a2
		.lásky5p4
		.lesos4
		.ľ4s4t
		.ľudovo5u
		.makro5k4
		.makro5o4
		.makro5s4
		.málo5k4
		.malo5o
		.málo5v4
		.márno5t4
		.medzi5h4
		.medzi5i4
		.medzi5p4
		.medzi5š4
		.medzi5t4
		.melo5d4
		.meru5ô2
		.miesto5d4
		.miesto5p4
		.mikro5e4
		.mikro5k4
		.mikro5o
		.mikro5p4
		.mimo5š4
		.mimo5ú
		.mimo5v4
		.mnoho5s4
		.mnoho5t4
		.mnoho5u
		.mnoho5v
		.mnoho5z
		.modro5o
		.mrako5d4
		.mravo5u
		.mucho5t4
		.m4z4d
		.na5a4
		.na5b4
		.na5c4
		.nad5h4
		.na5d4nes.
		.nad5p4
		.na5d4p4.
		.na5d4ŕ4.
		.na5d4robno.
		.na5h4
		.na5i4
		.na5k4
		.na5m4
		.na5o4
		.na5p4
		.ná5p4
		.národno5o
		.na5s4
		.na5st4
		.ná5s4
		.ná5st4
		.na5š4
		.na5šk4
		.na6š5sk
		.na5t4
		.na5u4
		.na5ú4
		.ná5u4
		.ná5ú4
		.na5v4l
		.na5v4na
		.na5v4r4
		.ná5v4r4
		.na5v4z4
		.na5z4r
		.na5z4v
		.na6z5vyš
		.náz5v4
		.na5ž4
		.ne5a4
		.ne5do3u2k
		.ne5e4
		.ne5i4
		.ne5m4
		.ne5na5h4
		.ne5na5i4
		.ne5na5k4
		.ne5na5m4
		.ne5na5p4
		.ne5na5s4
		.ne5na5t4
		.ne5p4
		.ne5s4
		.ne6s5tor
		.ne5š4
		.ne5t4
		.ne6t5t
		.ne5u2
		.ne5ú2
		.ne5v4
		.ne5z4d4r
		.ne5z4d4v
		.ne5z4l
		.ne5z4m
		.ne5z4n
		.ne5z4r
		.ne5z4v
		.nie5k4
		.ni5k4
		.ni6k5toš
		.nízko5k4
		.novo5u2
		.novo5z2
		.obi5d4
		.ob5k4
		.obo5s4
		.obo5z4
		.ob5s4
		.ob5t4
		.ob5z4
		.od5b4
		.od5c4
		.od5d4
		.od5f4
		.od5h4
		.od5c4h4
		.od5i4
		.od6i5ó
		.od5í4
		.od5k4
		.odo5b4
		.odo5h4
		.odo5k4
		.odo5m4k4
		.odo5p4
		.odo5s4
		.od5p4
		.od5s4
		.od5š4
		.od5t4
		.od5v4
		.od5z4
		.t4v4r
		.o5h4l
		.o5h4ľ
		.o5h4na
		.o5h4nú
		.o5h4r
		.o5c4h4
		.o5k4l
		.o5k4ľ
		.okolo5i
		.okolo5s4
		.o5k4ra
		.o5k4rá
		.o5k4resať
		.o5k4resávať
		.o5k4ri
		.o5k4rí
		.o5k4ru
		.o5k4rú
		.o5m4l
		.o5m4n
		.o5m4r
		.o5p4
		.o6p5lan
		.o6p5rat
		.o5s4lab
		.o5s4lad
		.o5s4lav
		.o5s4láv
		.o5s4lep
		.o5s4lo
		.o5s4p4
		.o5s4tar
		.o5s4tať
		.o5s4tan
		.o5s4taň
		.o6s5tatn
		.o5s4tatok
		.o5s4tatk
		.o5s4táv
		.o5s6to5
		.o5s6t4rap
		.ostro5u
		.o5s4ved
		.o5s4vetl
		.o5s4viet
		.o5s4viež
		.o5s4vit
		.o5s4voj
		.o5š4k4
		.o5š4ľ4
		.o5š4m4
		.o5š4p4
		.o5š4v4
		.o5t4ras
		.o5t4rav
		.o5t4ráv
		.o5t4rep
		.o5t4ria
		.o5v4dov
		.o5v4lád
		.o5v4laž
		.o5v4p4
		.o5v4r
		.o5z4l4
		.o5z4n
		.o5z4re
		.o5z4v4l
		.päť5izbo
		.plno5a
		.plno5p4
		.plno5š4
		.plno5kr4
		.plocho5d4
		.po5b4
		.po5č4
		.poda5k4
		.pod5b4r
		.pod5h4
		.pod5c4h
		.pod5k4
		.pod5p4
		.po5d4ráž
		.po5d4rep
		.pod5re
		.po5d4rh
		.po5d4rie
		.po5d4rm
		.po5d4rv
		.po5d4r4ž
		.pod5s4koč
		.pod5v4
		.pod3zem
		.pod3zol
		.pod3ža
		.pod3žu
		.po5h4
		.po6h5reb
		.po5c4h4
		.po5i4
		.po5k4
		.pol5d4
		.pol5i4z
		.polo5a
		.polo5b4
		.pol5o4blú
		.polo5d4
		.polo5h4l
		.polo5i
		.polo5k4
		.polo5m4
		.polo5o4
		.polo5p4
		.polo5s4
		.polo5t4
		.polo5u4
		.polo5ú4
		.polo5v4
		.polo5z4
		.pol5s4t
		.po5m4
		.po6m5ník
		.po5o4
		.po5ob4h
		.po5ob4l
		.po5s4
		.po6s4t5s4k4rip
		.po6s5tul
		.po5š4
		.po6š5ta
		.po6š5tov
		.po6š5v
		.po5t4k4n
		.po5t4ľ
		.po5t4r
		.poroz5p4
		.poroz5s4
		.poroz5v4
		.po6st5g4r
		.po6s5ti
		.po5t4
		.po5u
		.po5v4
		.po4v5ra
		.povy5h4
		.povy5k4
		.povy5p4
		.povy5s4
		.povy5v4
		.povy5z4
		.po5v4z4b
		.po5z4
		.pra5o4
		.pra5p4
		.pravicovo5o
		.pra5v4l
		.pra5v4nu
		.pra5v4nú
		.prá5vo5p4
		.pra5vo5s4
		.pre5b4
		.pre5c4
		.pred5c4
		.pred5h4
		.pred5ch4
		.pred5i
		.pred5k4
		.pred5m4
		.predo5h4
		.pred5op
		.pred5ostatn
		.pred5p4
		.pre5d4rah
		.pre5d4rap
		.pre5d4rať
		.pre5d4raž
		.pre5d4ri
		.pre5d4rž
		.pred5s4
		.pred5v4
		.pred5z4
		.pre5č4
		.pre5e2
		.pre5f2
		.pre5h4
		.pre5c4h4
		.pre5i4
		.pre5k4
		.pre6k5vap
		.pre5m4
		.pre5o4
		.pre5p4
		.pre5s4
		.pre6s5n
		.pre5š4
		.pre5t4
		.pre5v4
		.pre5z4
		.pre5ž4
		.pri5b4
		.pri5č4
		.pri5d4
		.pri5h4
		.pri5c4h4
		.pri5k4
		.prí5k4
		.pri5m4
		.pri5p4
		.pri5s4
		.prí5s4
		.prí6s5p
		.pri6s5p
		.pri5s4pô
		.pri5š4
		.pri6š5la.
		.pri6š5li.
		.pri6š5lo.
		.pri5t4
		.pri5v4
		.pri5z4
		.pri5ž4
		.re5g4
		.re5k4
		.re6k5v
		.re5p4
		.re6p5n
		.re5š4
		.re5t4
		.ro4z5i4
		.ro6z5í4
		.rozo5b4
		.rozo5d4
		.rozo5c4h4
		.rozo5m4
		.rozo5p4
		.rozo5r4
		.rozo5s4
		.rozo5š4
		.rozo5z4
		.rozo5ž4
		.ro6z5u4
		.ro6z5v4
		3s4polu5
		3s4polu5h4
		3s4polu5p4
		3s4polu5v4
		.šikmo5o
		.široko5
		.široko5p4
		.štáto5
		.št4vor5
		.su4b5s4
		.sú5h4
		.sú5k4r
		.sú5m4r
		.sú5s4
		.sú5v4
		.sú5z4
		.troj5
		.t4v4r4do5
		.viac5k4
		.viac5v4
		.vide2o5
		.vnútro5s4
		.vnútro5š4
		.vo5p4ch
		.vo5p4r
		.vo5s4p
		.vo5t4
		.vo5v4
		.vy5
		.vý5
		.vy5b4
		.vy5c4
		.vý5c4
		.vy5č4
		.vý5č4
		.vy5d4
		.vý5d4
		.vy5h4
		.vy6h5ň
		.vy6h5ne
		.vý5h4
		.vy5c4h4
		.vy5k4
		.vý5k4
		.vy5m4
		.vy5p4
		.vý5p4
		.vy5s4
		.vý5s4
		.vy5š4
		.vy6š5š
		.vý6š5k
		.vy5t4
		.vý5t4
		.vy5v4
		.vy5z4
		.vý5z4
		.za5b4
		.zá5b4
		.za5c4
		.za5č4
		.za5d4
		.za5h4
		.za5c4h4
		.za5k4
		.za5m4
		.za5p4
		.za5r4
		.za5s4
		.za5š4
		.za5t4
		.za5v4
		.za5z4
		.za5ž4
		.zá5k4
		.zá5z4
		.zo5b4
		.zo6d5p
		.zo5d4r
		.zo5d4v
		.zo5h4
		.zo5m4l
		.zo5m4r
		.zo5s4
		.zo5š4
		.zo5t4
		.zo5v4
		.zo5z4
		.zo5ž4
		<!-- % slovné základy -->
		5alkohol
		auto4rk
		auto4rs
		5b4lah
		5b4ledn
		5b4lesk
		5b4lok
		5b4lúd
		5b4lysk
		5b4lysn
		5boh3vi4e3a2k
		5boh3vi4e3o2d3k
		5boh3z4
		5boles4t5n
		5b4rať
		5b4rázd
		5b4rec2h
		5b4ronz
		5b4ruč
		5b4rús
		5b4rýzg
		5c4muk
		5c4nie
		5c4vak
		5c4vič
		5c4vik
		čí6s5lov
		5č4len
		5č4lánk
		5č4lánok
		5č4lov
		5d4ňov
		5d4ramat
		5d4rať
		5d4vanás4ť5
		5d4vih
		5d4viž
		5d4voj
		5d4vor
		5e2u2róp
		5f4ľak
		5f4lias
		5f4rancú
		5f4rekven
		5f4ráz
		5g4raf
		5g4ram
		pro6g5ram
		5g4réč
		5g4rob
		5g4vardej
		5h4lad
		5h4las
		5h4lav
		5h4ľad
		5h4liad
		5h4luch
		5h4mat
		5h4mot
		5h4nať
		5h4ned
		5h4nev
		5h4niezd
		5h4noj
		5h4nut
		5h4núť
		5h4nút
		5h4rab
		5h4r3mot
		5h4ran
		5h4rať
		5h4rob
		5h4rom
		5h4roz
		5h4rub
		5h4ryz
		5h4viezd
		5c6h4lap
		5c6h4leb
		5c6hran
		5c6h4rán
		5c6h4ráň
		5c6h4vál
		5c6h4vát
		5c6h4vat
		5c6h4vost
		5jedenás4t5k
		5jedenás4ť5
		5k4lad
		5k4laď
		5k4ľak
		5k4lam
		5k4lásť
		5k4liat
		5k4liať
		5k4lep
		5k4les
		5k4ľúč
		5k4resb
		5k4resť
		5k4ritic
		5k4rídl
		5k4rôch
		5k4ruh
		5k4rúž
		5k4ryt
		5k4valif
		5k4valit
		5k4vet
		5k4vadr
		5m4ladis4t3v
		5m4nož
		5m4rav
		5m4ráz
		na5d4ž4ga
		na5d4ž4gá
		nav3š4tev
		náv3š4tev
		nav3š4tív
		5p4lán
		5p4lastik
		5p4lat
		5p4lav
		5p4leta
		5p4letie
		5p4letú
		5p4liesť
		5p4ne2umat
		5p4ráv
		s6práv
		5p4riam
		5p4rirod
		5p2risám
		5p4roduk
		5s4fér
		5s4c2hopn
		5s4k4lad
		5s4k4lon
		5s4koč
		5s4kok
		5s4kop
		5s4kor
		5s4kôr
		5s4k4romne
		5s4k4rot
		5s4k4rúc
		5s4k4rutk
		5s4k4rýv
		5s4kúsen
		5s4kutoč
		5s4k4vúc
		5s4ladk
		5s4lav
		5s4láv
		5s4led
		5s4lep
		5s4lovn
		5s4love
		5s4lova
		5s4lovk
		5s4luh
		5s4lúž
		5s4ľub
		5s4maž
		5s4mel
		5s4mer
		5s4piev
		5s4pev
		5s4por
		5s4potreb
		5s4p4ravod
		5s4p4raved
		5s4p4rávn
		5s4p4ravo
		5s4tarost
		5s4tatic
		5s4tav
		5s4t4rach
		5s4t4ran
		5s4t4rán
		5s4t4ráda
		5s4t4raš
		5s4t2rat
		5s4t2red
		5s4t2rek
		5s4t4rel
		5s4t4reľ
		5s4t4riel
		5s4t4rieľ
		5s4t4rih
		5s4t4riž
		5s4t4rom
		5s4t4rúh
		5s4t4run
		5s4t4ruž
		5s4tati
		5d2ve5s4to
		5t2ri5s4to
		5š4tyri5s4to
		5päť5s4to
		5šes4ť5s4to
		5sedem5s4to
		5osem5s4to
		5deväť5s4to
		5päť5
		5šes4ť5
		5s4t4la
		5s4tup
		5s4ved
		5š4ľah
		5š4liap
		5š4kola
		5š4k4rab
		5š4k4rie
		5š4pin
		5š4p4liech
		5š4print
		5š4tart
		5š4tát
		5š4tep
		5š4tít
		5š4t4ruktúr
		5š4tude
		5š4tudo
		5š4t4vera
		5š4t4vorec
		5š4tyli
		5š4ťast
		5štiep4
		5š4t4v4r4ť5k4
		5š4t4v4r4ť5l4
		5š4t4v4r4ť5r4
		5š4t4v4r4ť5s4
		5t4lač
		5t4lak
		5t4ran4s5
		5t4ras
		5t4resk
		5t4retin
		5t4ried
		5t4rub
		5t4r4vaj
		5t4r4val
		5t4r4van
		5uholník
		5uhoľn
		5viac5h4
		5v4čera
		5v4lád
		5v4las
		5v4rás
		5v4rav
		5v4rat
		5v4rát
		5v4šimn
		5v4ták
		5v4tip
		5vy5s4t4rája
		5v4z4du
		5v4z4ťah
		5v4z4ťaž
		5z4lom
		5z4luč
		5z4mysel
		5z4mysl
		5z4nak
		5z4nám
		5z4náša
		5z4rak
		5z4väz
		5z4vest
		5zv4esť
		5z4vod
		5z4vuk
		5z4vuč
		5ž4ráč
		5ž4rane
		5ž4reb
		5ž4rút
		<!-- %začiatky slov -->
		.cv6
		.ch6
		.sp6
		.st6
		.šk6
		.šp6
		.št6
		.tk6
		.uh6
		.uc6h6
		.uk6
		.um6
		.up6
		.us6
		.ús6
		.usc6h6
		.úsc6h
		.usk6
		.úsl6
		.usm6
		.úsm6
		.ús7ta.
		.ús7tami.
		.ús7toč
		.ús7ti
		.ust6l
		.úst7ny
		.ust6r
		.ús7tret
		.us7t4ric
		.ús6t6r
		.úš6
		.ut6
		.uv6
		.uz6
		.vd6
		.vh6
		.vk6
		.vp6
		.vs6
		.vš6
		.vt6
		.vz6
		.vzh6
		.vzk6
		.vzl6
		.vzp6
		.vž6
		.zb6
		.zd6n
		.zd6r
		.zd6v
		.zg6
		.zh6
		.zm6
		.zr6
		.zv6
		<!-- %koncovky -->
		4b4s4ť.
		8c4h.
		8d4z.
		8d4ž.
		4c4ht4.
		4j4s4ť.
		4lt.
		4m4p4r.
		4m4p4s.
		4m4š4t.
		4n4k4t.
		4p4r4v.
		4rd.
		r4p4t.
		r4š4č.
		r4t4z.
		4st.
		4sť.
		5k4rát.
		5s4to5k4rát.
		5t4ľ4c4ť.
		<!-- %cudzie slová -->
		akci3a2
		akvári3u2m
		gymnázi3um
		le2u3kémia
		t2ri3u2mf
		kli3e2nt
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
